Maine, session 132, LD1043.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §1819-A, as amended by PL 2009, c. 440, §1, is further amended
to read:
§1819-A. Day use passes for certain veterans; immediate family members
Notwithstanding section 1819, the commissioner shall enter into a memorandum of
agreement with the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management for the
issuance of a free day use pass to state parks and historic sites to each veteran determined
by the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management to meet the criteria
established in Title 37‑B, section 8 and that veteran's immediate family members. The pass
entitles the holder to admission free of charge to all state parks and historic sites. For
purposes of this section, "immediate family members" means the veteran's spouse,
domestic partner and dependent children.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §1819-B, as enacted by PL 2009, c. 220, §2, is amended to read:
§1819-B. Day use passes for active military personnel; immediate family members
Notwithstanding section 1819, the commissioner shall enter into a memorandum of
agreement with the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management for the
issuance of a free day use pass to state parks and historic sites to each active duty military
member determined by the Department of Defense, Veterans and Emergency Management
to meet the criteria established in Title 37‑B, section 7 and that active duty military
member's immediate family members. The pass entitles the holder, and the holder's spouse
and children when accompanied by the holder, to admission free of charge to all state parks
and historic sites. For purposes of this section, "immediate family members" means the
active duty military member’s spouse, domestic partner and dependent children.